Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3634.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3634.3. A. A health insurance plan or policy or health
maintenance organization providing prescription drugs as a covered
benefit shall provide a pharmacy or group of pharmacies with the
right to bid on a periodic basis, but not less than every three (3)
years, on any pharmacy contract to provide pharmacy services,
including, but not limited to, prescription drugs.
B. A health insurance plan or policy or health maintenance
organization providing prescription drugs as a covered benefit shall
notify its customers in writing at least thirty (30) days in advance
of renewal of the insured's insurance premium if the health
Req. No. 10744 Page 1

insu rance plan or policy or health maintenance organization is no
longer providing coverage for a medication that was prescribed or
purchased in the past year by the insured.
C. Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to preclude a
health insurance plan or policy or health maintenance organization
from establishing an open pharmacy network for the provision of
pharmacy services, including, but not limited to, prescription
drugs.
C. D. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
health insurance plan or policy or health maintenance organization
that maintains an open pharmacy network.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10744 TJ 01/14/25










Req. No. 10744 Page 2